apertium-ne-en.ne.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 2
	Entries: 310
	Sdefs: 77
	Paradigms: 40

-->
<dictionary>
  <!-- 'alphabet' does *not* mean 'the alphabet of the language', it means the accepted 
  set of characters in a word - *DO NOT ADD PUNCTUATION OR SPACES* even if it doesn't look
  'pretty' enough -->
	<alphabet>ँं:अआइईउऊऋएऐओऔािुूेैोौकखगघङचछजझञटठडढणतथदधनपफबभमयरलवशषसह्ी</alphabet>

	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="det" />
		<sdef n="ind" />
		<sdef n="itg" />
		<sdef n="ij" />
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" />
		<sdef n="pri" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="top" /> 
		<sdef n="ant" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" />
		<sdef n="ger" />  
		<sdef n="al" /> 
		<sdef n="cog" /> 
		<sdef n="atn" /> 
		<sdef n="enc" /> 
		<sdef n="pro" /> 
		<sdef n="n" 	c="Noun"/> 
		<sdef n="num" 	c="Number"/> 
		<sdef n="prn" 	c="Pronoun"/> 
		<sdef n="np" 	c="Propernoun"/> 
		<sdef n="vblex" 	c="verb"/> 
		<sdef n="vbser"		c="Verb 'to be'"/>
		<sdef n="vbhaver" 	c="verb have"/>
		<sdef n="vibhakti" 	c="ले, संग"/>
		<sdef n="pres"/> 
		<sdef n="pp"/>
		<sdef n="pos"/>
		<sdef n="past"/> 
		<sdef n="adj" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="sint" 	c="Adjective"/> 
		<sdef n="cnjcoo" 	c="Conjunction co-ordinator"/> 
		<sdef n="m" 	c="masculine"/> 
		<sdef n="f" 	c="feminine"/> 
		<sdef n="post" />
		<sdef n="subj" />

		<sdef n="obl" 	c="oblique"/> 
		<sdef n="case:any" 	c="any"/> 
		<sdef n="sg" 	c="singular"/> 
		<sdef n="pl" 	c="plural"/> 
		<sdef n="sp" 	c="any"/> 
		<sdef n="p1" 	c="first"/> 
		<sdef n="p2" 	c="second"/> 
		<sdef n="p3" 	c="third"/>
		<sdef n="adv"	c="adverb"/>
		<sdef n="preadv" c="preadverb"/>
		<sdef n="lh" 	c="low_honorific"/> 
		<sdef n="mh" 	c="mid_honorific"/> 
		<sdef n="hh" 	c="high_honorific"/> 
		<sdef n="per:any" 	c="any"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:subj" 	c="subjunctive"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:छ" 	c="छ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:छन्" 	c="छन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छ" 	c="न्छ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:नुहुन्छ" 	c="नुहुन्छ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छु" 	c="न्छु"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छौ" 	c="न्छौ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छौँ" 	c="न्छौँ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:इछ" 	c="इछ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:नेछ" 	c="नेछ"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:नेछन्" 	c="नेछन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छन्" 	c="न्छन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:छिन्" 	c="छिन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:न्छिन्" 	c="न्छिन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:ला" 	c="ला"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:लान्" 	c="लान्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:लिन्" 	c="लिन्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:लास्" 	c="लास्"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:ली" 	c="ली"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:यो" 	c="यो"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:ए" 	c="ए"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:ई" 	c="ई"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:नुभयो" 	c="नुभयो"/> 
		<sdef n="tam:0" 	c="0"/> 
		<sdef n="sent" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
    <!-- Punctuation -->

<pardef n="separa">
<e>       <re>[.\?;:!]</re><p><l></l>                  <r><s n="sent"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Interrogation -->
<pardef n="के__det">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="det"/><s n="itg"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<!-- Preposition -->
<pardef n="मा__pr">
<e>	<p><l></l>	<r><s n="pr"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Numerals -->

<pardef n="numeros">
<e>       <re>[0-9]+([.,][0-9]+)?</re><p><l></l>       <r><s n="num"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="one__num">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="num"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="two__num">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="num"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Adjectives -->

<pardef n="काल/ो__adj">
<e>       <p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ी</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
<!-- <e>       <p><l>ा</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> -->
<e>       <p><l>ी</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/></r></p></e>
<e>	  <p><l>ो</l>					<r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ो</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="m"/></r></p></e>
<e r="RL"><p><l>ी</l>                                  <r>ो<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="f"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="सुन्दर__adj">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sp"/><s n="case:any"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="र__cnjcoo">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="cnjcoo"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="post">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="post"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <!-- Vibhakti -->
<pardef n="संग__vibhakti">
<e>       <p><l></l>                                   <r><s n="vibhakti"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>



    <!-- Verbs -->

<pardef n="खा__v">
<e>       <p><l>ऊँ</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:0"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>यो</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:यो"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ए</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:ए"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छ</l>                                <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:न्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छु</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:न्छु"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौ</l>                               <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:न्छौ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छौँ</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:न्छौ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:न्छन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नुहुन्छ</l>                            <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="tam:नुहुन्छ"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>न्छिन्</l>                             <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:न्छिन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नुभयो</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="hh"/><s n="sp"/><s n="tam:नुभयो"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ला</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="m"/><s n="tam:ला"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ली</l>                                 <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ली"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>नेछन्</l>                              <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="mh"/><s n="pl"/><s n="tam:नेछन्"/></r></p></e>
<e>       <p><l>ई</l>                                  <r><s n="vblex"/><s n="p3"/><s n="lh"/><s n="sg"/><s n="f"/><s n="tam:ई"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="ले"><i>ले</i><par n="post"/></e>
<e lm="मा"><i>मा</i><par n="post"/></e>
<e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="post"/></e>
<e lm="र"><i>र</i><par n="र__cnjcoo"/></e>
<e lm="एक"><i>एक</i><par n="one__num"/></e>
<e lm="दुई"><i>दुई</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="तीन"><i>तीन</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="चार"><i>चार</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="पाँच"><i>पाँच</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="छ"><i>छ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="सात"><i>सात</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="आठ"><i>आठ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="नौ"><i>नौ</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="दस"><i>दस</i><par n="two__num"/></e>
<e lm="संग"><i>संग</i><par n="संग__vibhakti"/></e>
<e lm="वयस्क"><i>वयस्क</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभागी"><i>अभागी</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभक्ष्य"><i>अभक्ष्य</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभक्त"><i>अभक्त</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अबल"><i>अबल</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अबला"><i>अबला</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अबाध"><i>अबाध</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अबाधित"><i>अबाधित</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभद्र"><i>अभद्र</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="आबद्ध"><i>आबद्ध</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभय"><i>अभय</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभेद्य"><i>अभेद्य</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिचारक"><i>अभिचारक</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिचारी"><i>अभिचारी</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिगृहीत"><i>अभिगृहीत</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिहत"><i>अभिहत</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिहित"><i>अभिहित</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिजात"><i>अभिजात</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिज्ञ"><i>अभिज्ञ</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिज्ञापक"><i>अभिज्ञापक</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिख्यात"><i>अभिख्यात</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिलक्षित"><i>अभिलक्षित</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिलाषी"><i>अभिलाषी</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिलषित"><i>अभिलषित</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अबिरल"><i>अबिरल</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभीष्ट"><i>अभीष्ट</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिशप्त"><i>अभिशप्त</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिवंदनीय"><i>अभिवंदनीय</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिवंदित"><i>अभिवंदित</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिव्यक्त"><i>अभिव्यक्त</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अभिगामी"><i>अभिगामी</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अलबानियन"><i>अलबानियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="अर्जेनटिनियन"><i>अर्जेनटिनियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="एसियन"><i>एसियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="कातलान"><i>कातलान</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="क्याथोलिक"><i>क्याथोलिक</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="क्रिस्चियन"><i>क्रिस्चियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="युरोपियन"><i>युरोपियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="इन्डियन"><i>इन्डियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="कोरियन"><i>कोरियन</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="मुस्लिम"><i>मुस्लिम</i><par n="सुन्दर__adj"/></e>
<e lm="कालो"><i>काल</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
<e lm="नराम्रो"><i>नराम्र</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
<e lm="राम्रो"><i>राम्र</i><par n="काल/ो__adj"/></e>
<e lm="मोइखा"><i>मोइखा</i><par n="खा__v"/></e>
<e lm="दुख दि"><i>दुख दि</i><par n="खा__v"/></e>
<e lm="के"><i>के</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="कुन"><i>कुन</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="कहाँ"><i>कहाँ</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="किन"><i>किन</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="कसरी"><i>कसरी</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="कहिले"><i>कहिले</i><par n="के__det"/></e>
<e lm="मा"><i>मा</i><par n="मा__pr"/></e>
<e lm="को"><i>को</i><par n="मा__pr"/></e>
